Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2228.02
Trainee real property appraiser; direct supervision; supervisory real property appraiser; qualifications; disciplinary action; effect; appraisal experience log.

(1) Each trainee real property appraiser's experience shall be subject to direct supervision by a supervisory real property appraiser. To qualify as a supervisory real property appraiser, a real property appraiser shall:

(a) Be a certified residential real property appraiser or certified general real property appraiser in good standing;

(b) Have held a certified real property appraiser credential in this state, or the equivalent in any other jurisdiction, for a minimum of three years immediately preceding the date of the written request for approval as supervisory real property appraiser;

(c) Have not successfully completed disciplinary action by the board or any other jurisdiction, which action limited the real property appraiser's legal eligibility to engage in real property appraisal practice within three years immediately preceding the date the written request for approval as supervisory real property appraiser is submitted by the applicant or trainee real property appraiser on a form approved by the board;

(d) As prescribed by rules and regulations of the board, have successfully completed a board-approved supervisory real property appraiser and trainee course preceding the date the written request for approval as supervisory real property appraiser is submitted by the applicant or trainee real property appraiser on a form approved by the board; and

(e) Certify that he or she understands his or her responsibilities and obligations under the Real Property Appraiser Act as a supervisory real property appraiser and applies his or her signature to the written request for approval as supervisory real property appraiser submitted by the applicant or trainee real property appraiser.

(2) The supervisory real property appraiser shall be responsible for the training and direct supervision of the trainee real property appraiser's experience by:

(a) Accepting responsibility for the report by applying his or her signature and certifying that the report is in compliance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;

(b) Reviewing the trainee real property appraiser reports; and

(c) Conducting a personal inspection with the trainee real property appraiser as is consistent with his or her scope of real property appraisal practice until the supervisory real property appraiser determines that the trainee real property appraiser is competent in accordance with the competency rule of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(3) A certified real property appraiser disciplined by the board or any other appraiser regulatory agency in another jurisdiction, which discipline may or may not have limited the real property appraiser's legal eligibility to engage in real property appraisal practice, shall not be eligible as a supervisory real property appraiser as of the date disciplinary action was imposed against the appraiser by the board or any other appraiser regulatory agency. The certified real property appraiser shall be considered to be in good standing and eligible as a supervisory real property appraiser upon the successful completion of disciplinary action that does not limit the real property appraiser's legal eligibility to engage in real property appraisal practice, or three years after the successful completion of disciplinary action that limits the real property appraiser's legal eligibility to engage in real property appraisal practice. Any action taken by the board or any other appraiser regulatory agency in another jurisdiction, which may or may not limit the real property appraiser's legal eligibility to engage in real property appraisal practice, involving any jurisdiction's isolated administrative responsibilities including, but not limited to, late payment of fees related to credentialing, failure to timely renew a credential, or failure to provide notification of a change in contact information, is not disciplinary action for the purpose of this subsection.

(4) The trainee real property appraiser may have more than one supervisory real property appraiser, but a supervisory real property appraiser may not supervise more than three trainee real property appraisers at one time.

(5) As prescribed by rules and regulations of the board, an appraisal experience log shall be maintained jointly by the supervisory real property appraiser and the trainee real property appraiser.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 48;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 74;

Laws 2021, LB23, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 9.